Hawaii, session 2025, SB1663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $35,310,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary, and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the eleventh senatorial district, as follows: 1.   President Abraham Lincoln Elementary School A.   Plans, design, and construction for perimeter chain link fencing for enhanced security near Punchbowl abutting the National Cemetery of the Pacific; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                           $25,000 Design                          $25,000 Construction                   $260,000 Total funding                                 $310,000 B.   Construction of a play court cover to address hazardous weather conditions. Construction; equipment and appurtenances.   $2,500,000 Total funding                               $2,810,000 2.   Queen Kaahumanu Elementary School A.   Plans, design, and construction for eight-feet of perimeter link fencing for enhanced security in high-traffic neighborhood; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                           $25,000 Design                          $25,000 Construction                 $1,100,000 Total funding                               $1,150,000 B.   Design and construction of rolling gates for two parking lot entrances; equipment and appurtenances.                            $500,000 Total funding                               $1,650,000 3.   Manoa Elementary School A.   Plans, design, equipment, and construction of an upgraded telephone system utilizing computer technology to link all classrooms to the administrative offices; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $100,000 Design                         $100,000 Construction                   $400,000 Equipment                    $2,400,000 Total funding                               $3,000,000 4.   Noelani Elementary School A.   Replacement of current kindergarten portable classrooms; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $250,000 Design                         $250,000 Construction                 $5,000,000 Total funding                               $5,500,000 5.   Robert Louis Stevenson Middle School A.   Purchase and installation of a public announcement system to enable student public safety notifications during school emergency conditions; equipment and appurtenances. Speakers                       $130,000 Installation and equipment      $870,000 Total funding                               $1,000,000 B.   Reconstruction of music facilities to serve band, orchestra, performing arts, and general music classes; equipment and appurtenances. Plans and design             $2,000,000 Electrical upgrades           $1,000,000 Construction                $15,000,000 Equipment                      $500,000 Total funding                              $18,500,000 6.   Department of land and natural resources A.   Plans, design, and construction for a perimeter chain link fence to enhance security adjacent to department of Hawaiian home lands properties on Punchbowl hillside; equipment and appurtenances. Plans and design               $100,000 Construction                   $250,000 Total funding                                 $350,000 B.   Plans, design, and construction of permanent guardrails in the vicinity of 3798 Tantalus Drive; equipment and appurtenances. Plans and design               $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 SECTION 2.  The appropriations made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriations are made; provided that all moneys from the appropriations that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  The sum appropriated for the respective capital improvement projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended for the purposes of this Act as follows: (1)  The sum appropriated in items 1 through 5 shall be expended by the department of education; and (2)  The sum appropriated in item 6 shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________